Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.060

Requisites of notice.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1007.SL) ***

The notice of claim directed to the defendant shall contain: (1) The name and address of the plaintiff; (2) a brief and concise statement of the nature and amount of the claim; (3) a statement directing and requiring defendant to appear personally in the small claims department at a time certain, which shall not be less than five days from the date of service of the notice; and (4) a statement advising the defendant that in case of his or her failure to appear, judgment will be given against defendant for the amount of the claim.

[1984 c 258 s 63; 1981 c 331 s 11; 1919 c 187 s 6; RRS s 1777-6.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.